Utah statutes.
34-29-18.   Copies of laws to be posted.

The keeper of an employment or intelligence office shall cause two copies of Sections 34-29-7 to 34-29-10, inclusive, and of Sections 34-29-13 to 34-29-15, inclusive, printed in type of sufficient size to be easily read, to be conspicuously posted in each room used or occupied for the purpose of such employment or intelligence office.

